Louisiana, session 2026, HB59.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 15:161.1 is hereby enacted to read as follows:
§161.1. District public defender; Nineteenth Judicial District Court; East Baton
Rouge Parish
A. In addition to any funding provided by the office of the state public
defender, the office of the district public defender for the Nineteenth Judicial District
Court, East Baton Rouge Parish shall be entitled to an expense allowance for the
salaries of the public defenders, stenographers, clerks, and secretaries, and salaries
for special officers, investigators, and other employees, and an expense allowance
for stationery forms, telephone, transportation, travel, postage, hotel, and other
expenses incurred in the discharge of their official duties.
Page 1 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 59 ENROLLED
B.(1) The governing authority of the parish of East Baton Rouge is hereby
authorized to pay a sum of not less than one million dollars from its general fund for
any of the items of expense, as provided by this Section, incurred by the district
public defender when acting in his official capacity.
(2) This Subsection terminates on July 1, 2028.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 2 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.